Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 15 Fees and Charges

46-3-500.
Authority of Secretary of State to charge and collect fees generally.

The Secretary of State shall charge and collect in accordance with this article:

Fees for filing documents and issuing certificates; and

Miscellaneous charges.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1401, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-501.
Fees for filing documents and issuing certificates.

The Secretary of State shall charge and collect for:

Filing articles of incorporation and issuing a certificate of incorporation $ 15.00 (2) Filing articles of amendment and issuing a certificate of amendment 15.00 (3) Filing restated articles of incorporation and issuing a certificate of restated articles 15.00 (4) Filing articles of merger or consolidation and issuing a certificate of merger or consolidation 20.00 (5) Filing an application to reserve a corporate name generally 3.00 (6) Filing an application to reserve a corporate name for a period of five years pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 46-3-221 30.00 (7) Filing a notice of transfer of a reserved corporate name 3.00 (8) Filing a statement of change of address of registered office or change of registered agent, or both 3.00 (9) Filing a statement of intent to dissolve 1.00 (10) Filing a statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings 1.00 (11) Filing articles of dissolution 1.00 (12) Filing an application of a foreign electric cooperative for certificate of authority to transact business in this state and issuing a certificate of authority 100.00 (13) Filing an application of a foreign electric cooperative for an amended certificate of authority to transact business in this state and issuing an amended certifi cate of authority 20.00 (14) Filing a copy of an amendment to the articles of incorporation of a foreign electric cooperative holding a certificate of authority to transact business in this state 10.00 (15) Filing a copy of articles of merger of a foreign electric cooperative holding a certificate of authority to transact business in this state 20.00 (16) Filing an application for withdrawal of a foreign electric cooperative and issuing a certificate of withdrawal 10.00 (17) Filing any other statement or report, except an annual report, of an electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative 3.00 (18) Filing the annual report of an electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative 5.00

Click to view

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1402, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-502.
Fees for furnishing certified copies of documents, instruments, and papers and for furnishing a certificate of search or a certificate of good standing.

The Secretary of State shall charge and collect:

For furnishing a certified copy of any document, instrument, or paper relating to an electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative, 30¢ per page and $1.00 for the certificate and affixing the seal thereto;

For furnishing a certificate of search or a certificate of good standing, $5.00;

At the time of any service of process on him as resident agent of an electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative, $10.00, which amount may be recovered as taxable costs by the party to the action causing such service to be made if such party prevails in the action.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1403, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1474, § 4.

46-3-503.
Fees for advertising.

The fee to be allowed to publishers for publishing any notice required under this article shall be $15.00 for each insertion.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1404, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.